Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,327
Department; review studies and assessments; report.

(1) The department shall review and evaluate the studies and assessments carried out by Illinois, Vermont, and Washington regarding whether products or batteries that are not currently covered by the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act should be covered at a later date. The department may review similar studies or assessments carried out by any other state or person.

(2) No later than May 30, 2028, the department shall electronically submit a report to the Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature. The report shall include the findings and recommendations of any study or assessment reviewed by the department under this section. The report may include recommendations for legislation based on the department's evaluation of the studies and assessments reviewed by the department.

Laws 2025, LB36, § 14.